District of Columbia statutes.
3-1520

Repealed

Use of title or designation — Penalty.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-59, § 21, 24 DCR 5975
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 417, 32 DCR 4450
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1234, 46 DCR 3142
Revision of chapter: See note to § 3-1501.
1973 Ed., § 2-960.
1981 Ed., § 2-120.